waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.aff
SFX Q as      iausiojoje      [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiojoj       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      žiausioji       das
SFX Q as      žiausiosios     das
SFX Q as      žiausiajai      das
SFX Q as      žiausiąją       das
SFX Q as      žiausiąja       das
SFX Q as      žiausiojoje     das
SFX Q as      žiausiojoj      das
SFX Q s       usioji          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiosios        [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiajai         [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiąją          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiąja          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiojoje        [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiojoj         [ij]as
SFX Q tas     čiausioji       tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiosios     tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiajai      tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiąją       tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiąja       tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiojoje     tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiojoj      tas
SFX Q us      iausioji        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiosios      [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiajai       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiąją        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiąja        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiojoje      [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiojoj       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiausioji       dus
SFX Q us      žiausiosios     dus
SFX Q us      žiausiajai      dus
SFX Q us      žiausiąją       dus
SFX Q us      žiausiąja       dus
SFX Q us      žiausiojoje     dus
SFX Q us      žiausiojoj      dus
SFX Q us      ausioji         jus
SFX Q us      ausiosios       jus
SFX Q us      ausiajai        jus
SFX Q us      ausiąją         jus
SFX Q us      ausiąja         jus
SFX Q us      ausiojoje       jus
SFX Q us      ausiojoj        jus
SFX Q tus     čiausioji       tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiosios     tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiajai      tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiąją       tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiąja       tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiojoje     tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiojoj      tus
SFX Q as      iausieji        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiųjų        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiesiems     [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiuosius     [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiaisiais    [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiuosiuose   [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      žiausieji       das
SFX Q as      žiausiųjų       das
SFX Q as      žiausiesiems    das
SFX Q as      žiausiuosius    das
SFX Q as      žiausiaisiais   das
SFX Q as      žiausiuosiuose  das
SFX Q s       usieji          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiųjų          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiesiems       [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiuosius       [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiaisiais      [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiuosiuose     [ij]as
SFX Q tas     čiausieji       tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiųjų       tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiesiems    tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiuosius    tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiaisiais   tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiuosiuose  tas
SFX Q us      iausieji        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiųjų        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiesiems     [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiuosius     [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiaisiais    [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiuosiuose   [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiausieji       dus
SFX Q us      žiausiųjų       dus
SFX Q us      žiausiesiems    dus
SFX Q us      žiausiuosius    dus
SFX Q us      žiausiaisiais   dus
SFX Q us      žiausiuosiuose  dus
SFX Q us      ausieji         jus
SFX Q us      ausiųjų         jus
SFX Q us      ausiesiems      jus
SFX Q us      ausiuosius      jus
SFX Q us      ausiaisiais     jus
SFX Q us      ausiuosiuose    jus
SFX Q tus     čiausieji       tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiųjų       tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiesiems    tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiuosius    tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiaisiais   tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiuosiuose  tus
SFX Q as      iausiosioms     [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiąsias      [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiosiomis    [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiosiose     [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      žiausiosioms    das
SFX Q as      žiausiąsias     das
SFX Q as      žiausiosiomis   das
SFX Q as      žiausiosiose    das
SFX Q s       usiosioms       [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiąsias        [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiosiomis      [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiosiose       [ij]as
SFX Q tas     čiausiosioms    tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiąsias     tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiosiomis   tas
SFX Q tas     čiausiosiose    tas
SFX Q us      iausiosioms     [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiąsias      [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiosiomis    [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiosiose     [^djt]us
SFX Q us      žiausiosioms    dus
SFX Q us      žiausiąsias     dus
SFX Q us      žiausiosiomis   dus
SFX Q us      žiausiosiose    dus
SFX Q us      ausiosioms      jus
SFX Q us      ausiąsias       jus
SFX Q us      ausiosiomis     jus
SFX Q us      ausiosiose      jus
SFX Q tus     čiausiosioms    tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiąsias     tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiosiomis   tus
SFX Q tus     čiausiosiose    tus
SFX Q s       i               as
SFX Q us      iai             [^j]us
SFX Q us      ai              jus
SFX Q as      iau             [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      žiau            das
SFX Q s       u               [ij]as
SFX Q tas     čiau            tas
SFX Q us      iau             [^dtj]us
SFX Q us      žiau            dus
SFX Q tus     čiau            tus
SFX Q us      au              jus
SFX Q is      žiausiai        dis
SFX Q s       0               as
SFX Q s       0               us
SFX Q as      umas            [^i]as
SFX Q as      umo             [^i]as
SFX Q as      umui            [^i]as
SFX Q as      umą             [^i]as
SFX Q as      umu             [^i]as
SFX Q as      ume             [^i]as
SFX Q ias     umas            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     umo             [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     umui            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     umą             [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     umu             [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ume             [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tumas           čias
SFX Q čias    tumo            čias
SFX Q čias    tumui           čias
SFX Q čias    tumą            čias
SFX Q čias    tumu            čias
SFX Q čias    tume            čias
SFX Q s       mas             us
SFX Q s       mo              us
SFX Q s       mui             us
SFX Q s       mą              us
SFX Q s       mu              us
SFX Q s       me              us
SFX Q as      umai            [^i]as
SFX Q as      umų             [^i]as
SFX Q as      umams           [^i]as
SFX Q as      umus            [^i]as
SFX Q as      umais           [^i]as
SFX Q as      umuose          [^i]as
SFX Q ias     umai            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     umų             [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     umams           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     umus            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     umais           [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     umuose          [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tumai           čias
SFX Q čias    tumų            čias
SFX Q čias    tumams          čias
SFX Q čias    tumus           čias
SFX Q čias    tumais          čias
SFX Q čias    tumuose         čias
SFX Q s       mai             us
SFX Q s       mų              us
SFX Q s       mams            us
SFX Q s       mus             us
SFX Q s       mais            us
SFX Q s       muose           us
SFX Q as      okai            [^i]as
SFX Q ias     okai            [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tokai           čias
SFX Q us      okai            us
SFX Q as      okas            [^i]as
SFX Q as      oko             [^i]as
SFX Q as      okam            [^i]as
SFX Q as      oką             [^i]as
SFX Q as      oku             [^i]as
SFX Q as      okame           [^i]as
SFX Q ias     okas            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     oko             [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okam            [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     oką             [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     oku             [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     okame           [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tokas           čias
SFX Q čias    toko            čias
SFX Q čias    tokam           čias
SFX Q čias    toką            čias
SFX Q čias    toku            čias
SFX Q čias    tokame          čias
SFX Q us      okas            us
SFX Q us      oko             us
SFX Q us      okam            us
SFX Q us      oką             us
SFX Q us      oku             us
SFX Q us      okame           us
SFX Q as      oka             [^i]as
SFX Q as      okos            [^i]as
SFX Q as      okoje           [^i]as
