waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.dic
adaptyvus/BNQ
airiškas/BNQ
akivaruotas/BNQ
akuotingas/BNQ
alkanas/BNQ
amatininkiškas/BNQ
anemiškas/BNQ
ankščiuotas/BNQ
apatiškas/BNQ
apkalbus/BNQ
aptakus/BNQ
apžiūrus/BNQ
artus/BNQ
ateistiškas/BNQ
atkilus/BNQ
atokus/BNQ
atspėjamas/BNQ
atšlijas/BNQ
auksuotas/BNQ
automatiškas/BNQ
aštuonnytas/BNQ
balsus/BNQ
barnus/BNQ
bedieviškas/BNQ
beskoniškas/BNQ
birus/BNQ
blizgus/BNQ
brangus/BNQ
budrus/BNQ
bėras/BNQ
cinkuotas/BNQ
daiktavardiškas/BNQ
dangiškas/BNQ
darningas/BNQ
dažnas/BNQ
delsus/BNQ
detalus/BNQ
dievingas/BNQ
dirsėtas/BNQ
doringas/BNQ
drangus/BNQ
drovingas/BNQ
dryžas/BNQ
duburiuotas/BNQ
dumbluotas/BNQ
duslus/BNQ
dvilinkas/BNQ
dykas/BNQ
džiaugsmingas/BNQ
eikvus/BNQ
eksteritorialus/BNQ
elgetiškas/BNQ
erdvas/BNQ
estiškas/BNQ
fariziejiškas/BNQ
formalus/BNQ
gaisrus/BNQ
galingas/BNQ
garbingas/BNQ
gauruotas/BNQ
geležingas/BNQ
geras/BNQ
ginkluotas/BNQ
glebus/BNQ
gluodnas/BNQ
gracingas/BNQ
graudingas/BNQ
griežtas/BNQ
grotuotas/BNQ
grūduotas/BNQ
gvaldus/BNQ
gėdingas/BNQ
horizontalus/BNQ
ilsus/BNQ
inertiškas/BNQ
intravertiškas/BNQ
istoriškas/BNQ
išgąstingas/BNQ
išlaidus/BNQ
išraiškus/BNQ
ištisas/BNQ
jaunas/BNQ
junglus/BNQ
juslingas/BNQ
kairus/BNQ
kalningas/BNQ
kamblingas/BNQ
kantrus/BNQ
kartus/BNQ
kataloniškas/BNQ
keiksnus/BNQ
kemsuotas/BNQ
kerštingas/BNQ
kiblus/BNQ
kilus/BNQ
kiužas/BNQ
klegus/BNQ
klostuotas/BNQ
kniūpsčias/BNQ
komiškas/BNQ
konkurencingas/BNQ
korsikietiškas/BNQ
kramtus/BNQ
kreiduotas/BNQ
kritiškas/BNQ
krūmingas/BNQ
kuplus/BNQ
kvalifikuotas/BNQ
kūlėtas/BNQ
laimingas/BNQ
lajuotas/BNQ
lapiškas/BNQ
leduotas/BNQ
lepus/BNQ
liepsnotas/BNQ
liniuotas/BNQ
liūtingas/BNQ
lukšas/BNQ
lygnešas/BNQ
mainus/BNQ
malonus/BNQ
marksistiškas/BNQ
matomas/BNQ
mechanizuotas/BNQ
melagingas/BNQ
metaforiškas/BNQ
miestietiškas/BNQ
milžiniškas/BNQ
mistiškas/BNQ
moksleiviškas/BNQ
monolitiškas/BNQ
mulkiškas/BNQ
mėgstamas/BNQ
mūsiškas/BNQ
narsingas/BNQ
naujoviškas/BNQ
negirdėtas/BNQ
nenaudėliškas/BQ
neregėtas/BNQ
neįkainojamas/BNQ
nigerietiškas/BNQ
nominalus/BNQ
numanus/BNQ
nuogąstus/BNQ
nuosaulus/BNQ
nuovokus/BNQ
objektyvus/BNQ
oranžiškas/BNQ
pabirus/BNQ
pagavus/BNQ
pagyrūniškas/BNQ
pakalnus/BNQ
pakrikas/BNQ
palšvas/BNQ
paplokščias/BNQ
pareigingas/BNQ
pasaulietiškas/BNQ
paskiras/BNQ
pastovus/BNQ
patologiškas/BNQ
pavalgus/BNQ
pavyzdingas/BNQ
pažaidus/BNQ
pelkėtas/BNQ
perifrastiškas/BNQ
pesimistiškas/BNQ
pikantiškas/BNQ
pilnas/BNQ
pirštinėtas/BNQ
plaukuotas/BNQ
plonas/BNQ
plėtrus/BNQ
poringas/BNQ
praeinamas/BNQ
praktiškas/BNQ
prantus/BNQ
prašmatnus/BNQ
prestižiškas/BNQ
prieplaikus/BNQ
prieštaringas/BNQ
primityvus/BNQ
privatus/BNQ
prorusiškas/BNQ
prėskas/BNQ
purvinas/BNQ
putotas/BNQ
pūgotas/BNQ
raguotas/BNQ
raizgus/BNQ
rantėtas/BNQ
raupsuotas/BNQ
reaktyvus/BNQ
reikšmiškas/BNQ
represyvus/BNQ
rečiuotas/BNQ
rinčiuotas/BNQ
romus/BNQ
rumbėtas/BNQ
ryklus/BNQ
rūdingas/BNQ
rūškanas/BNQ
sakralus/BNQ
sangviniškas/BNQ
sartas/BNQ
savamoksliškas/BNQ
savininkiškas/BNQ
schematiškas/BNQ
senberniškas/BNQ
sergalingas/BNQ
siekiamas/BNQ
silpnas/BNQ
sistematiškas/BNQ
skaidus/BNQ
skardingas/BNQ
skiausčias/BNQ
skliausčias/BNQ
skrupulingas/BNQ
skubus/BNQ
slaptas/BNQ
slidus/BNQ
smagus/BNQ
smiglus/BNQ
smulkiasavininkiškas/BNQ
snaudulingas/BNQ
sodrus/BNQ
spalvingas/BNQ
spinduliuotas/BNQ
sprandingas/BNQ
spygliškas/BNQ
srovingas/BNQ
stambus/BNQ
stačiokiškas/BNQ
stingrus/BNQ
striukas/BNQ
sugestyvus/BNQ
sunkus/BNQ
sutartas/BNQ
sveikas/BNQ
sviestinas/BNQ
sąžiningas/BNQ
sūrus/BNQ
tampus/BNQ
tapybiškas/BNQ
taupus/BNQ
teigiamas/BNQ
tekstualus/BQ
terminuotas/BNQ
tikras/BNQ
tinklėtas/BNQ
tolerantingas/BNQ
tragikomiškas/BNQ
traukus/BNQ
trinytas/BNQ
troškus/BNQ
trūnus/BNQ
tuščias/BNQ
tvirtapradiškas/BNQ
tįslus/BNQ
uogotas/BNQ
utėlėtas/BNQ
vagiškas/BNQ
vakarietiškas/BNQ
valus/BNQ
varpingas/BNQ
veidmainiškas/BNQ
vergiškas/BNQ
veršiškas/BNQ
viengubas/BNQ
vikiuotas/BNQ
virpulingas/BNQ
vokiškas/BNQ
vėlus/BNQ
zuinus/BNQ
įgeidingas/BNQ
įnoringas/BNQ
įtakus/BNQ
įžeidus/BNQ
šankus/BNQ
šešeriopas/BNQ
širdingas/BNQ
šlubas/BNQ
švankus/BNQ
šyvas/BNQ
žaislus/BNQ
želmeningas/BNQ
žiežulingas/BNQ
žodyniškas/BNQ
žvirbliškas/BNQ
